Hawaii statutes.
[§551G-16] Appropriate forum. (a) A
court of the State of Hawaii having jurisdiction under section 551G-13 to
appoint a guardian or issue a protective order may decline to exercise its
jurisdiction if it determines at any time that a court of another state is a
more appropriate forum.

(b) If a court of the State of Hawaii declines
to exercise its jurisdiction under subsection (a), it shall either dismiss or
stay the proceeding. The court may impose any condition the court considers
just and proper, including the condition that a petition for the appointment of
a guardian or issuance of a protective order be filed promptly in another
state.

(c) In determining whether it is an
appropriate forum, the court shall consider all relevant factors, including:

(1) Any expressed preference of the respondent;

(2) Whether abuse, neglect, or exploitation of the
respondent has occurred or is likely to occur and which state could best
protect the respondent from the abuse, neglect, or exploitation;

(3) The length of time the respondent was physically
present in or was a legal resident of a state;

(4) The distance of the respondent from the court in
each state;

(5) The financial circumstances of the respondent's
estate;

(6) The nature and location of the evidence;

(7) The ability of the court in each state to decide
the issue expeditiously and the procedures necessary to present evidence;

(8) The familiarity of the court of each state with
the facts and issues in the proceeding; and

(9) If an appointment were made, the court's ability
to monitor the conduct of the guardian or conservator. [L 2012, c 236, pt of
§1]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next